Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 3. Wyoming Infrastructure Authority Projects

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 4, appropriates $250,000 from the general fund to be loaned by the state treasurer to the Wyoming infrastructure authority to pursue the construction of infrastructure authorized by the act and beneficial to the state of Wyoming. Monies loaned to the authority are to be repaid, with interest at an annual rate set by the state loan and investment board of not more than four percent (4%), to the general fund not later than June 30, 2009 from the proceeds of bonds issued by the authority. A loan agreement is to be prepared and approved by the attorney general before execution thereof and distribution of the loan proceeds.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 3, directs the authority to report to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee and the joint appropriations interim committee by October 1, 2004 about progress under the act. The infrastructure authority is to, at times it determines appropriate, report to the legislature regarding additional authority or increased debt limitations necessary or convenient to fulfill the purposes of the act. The report should include any recommendations for legislation and, if necessary, elections, to authorize the additional authority or debt limitations.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 5, makes this article effective July 1, 2004.

§ 37-5-301.
Wyoming infrastructure authority. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 1; 2014 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-302.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 1; 2014 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-303.
Purposes; budget. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 1; 2006, ch. 97, § 1; 2011, ch. 119, § 1; 2014 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-304.
Powers of the authority. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 1; 2014 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-305.
Bonds. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 1; 2006, ch. 97, § 1; 2015 ch. 181, § 1, effective March 9, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-306.
Use of net revenues. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 1; 2014 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-307.
Authority not subject to public service commission. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 84, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.